Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB510.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 118.651 is amended to read as follows:
It shall be the responsibility of the state chair[chairman] of each political party to notify
his or her party's national committee, no later than January 30 of each year in which such
presidential primary shall be conducted, of the provisions contained herein relating to the
automatic vote on the first ballot as required under KRS 118.551 to 118.641.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/11/2025 2:56 PM Jacketed